Illinois, session 104th, HB1285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/6)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.6)7    Sec. 6. (a) Every employer within the the provisions of 8this Act, shall, under the rules and regulations prescribed by 9the Commission, post printed notices in their respective 10places of employment in such number and at such places as may 11be determined by the Commission, containing such information 12relative to this Act as in the judgment of the Commission may 13be necessary to aid employees to safeguard their rights under 14this Act in event of injury.15    In addition thereto, the employer shall post in a 16conspicuous place on the place of the employment a printed or 17typewritten notice stating whether he is insured or whether he 18has qualified and is operating as a self-insured employer. In 19the event the employer is insured, the notice shall state the 20name and address of his insurance carrier, the number of the 21insurance policy, its effective date and the date of 22termination. In the event of the termination of the policy for 23any reason prior to the termination date stated, the posted   HB1285- 2 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1notice shall promptly be corrected accordingly. In the event 2the employer is operating as a self-insured employer the 3notice shall state the name and address of the company, if any, 4servicing the compensation payments of the employer, and the 5name and address of the person in charge of making 6compensation payments.7    (b) Every employer subject to this Act shall maintain 8accurate records of work-related deaths, injuries and illness 9other than minor injuries requiring only first aid treatment 10and which do not involve medical treatment, loss of 11consciousness, restriction of work or motion, or transfer to 12another job and file with the Commission, in writing, a report 13of all accidental deaths, injuries and illnesses arising out 14of and in the course of the employment resulting in the loss of 15more than 3 scheduled work days. In the case of death such 16report shall be made no later than 2 working days following the 17accidental death. In all other cases such report shall be made 18between the 15th and 25th of each month unless required to be 19made sooner by rule of the Commission. In case the injury 20results in permanent disability, a further report shall be 21made as soon as it is determined that such permanent 22disability has resulted or will result from the injury. All 23reports shall state the date of the injury, including the time 24of day or night, the nature of the employer's business, the 25name, address, age, sex, conjugal condition of the injured 26person, the specific occupation of the injured person, the   HB1285- 3 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1direct cause of the injury and the nature of the accident, the 2character of the injury, the length of disability, and in case 3of death the length of disability before death, the wages of 4the injured person, whether compensation has been paid to the 5injured person, or to his or her legal representative or his 6heirs or next of kin, the amount of compensation paid, the 7amount paid for physicians', surgeons' and hospital bills, and 8by whom paid, and the amount paid for funeral or burial 9expenses if known. The reports shall be made on forms and in 10the manner as prescribed by the Commission and shall contain 11such further information as the Commission shall deem 12necessary and require. The making of these reports releases 13the employer from making such reports to any other officer of 14the State and shall satisfy the reporting provisions as 15contained in the Safety Inspection and Education Act, the 16Health and Safety Act, and the Occupational Safety and Health 17Act. The reports filed with the Commission pursuant to this 18Section shall be made available by the Commission to the 19Director of Labor or his representatives and to all other 20departments of the State of Illinois which shall require such 21information for the proper discharge of their official duties. 22Failure to file with the Commission any of the reports 23required in this Section is a petty offense.24    Except as provided in this paragraph, all reports filed 25hereunder shall be confidential and any person having access 26to such records filed with the Illinois Workers' Compensation   HB1285- 4 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1Commission as herein required, who shall release any 2information therein contained including the names or otherwise 3identify any persons sustaining injuries or disabilities, or 4give access to such information to any unauthorized person, 5shall be subject to discipline or discharge, and in addition 6shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. The Commission shall 7compile and distribute to interested persons aggregate 8statistics, taken from the reports filed hereunder. The 9aggregate statistics shall not give the names or otherwise 10identify persons sustaining injuries or disabilities or the 11employer of any injured person or person with a disability.12    (c) Notice of the accident shall be given to the employer 13as soon as practicable, but not later than 45 days after the 14accident. Provided:15        (1) In case of the legal disability of the employee or 16    any dependent of a deceased employee who may be entitled 17    to compensation under the provisions of this Act, the 18    limitations of time by this Act provided do not begin to 19    run against such person under legal disability until a 20    guardian has been appointed.21        (2) In cases of injuries sustained by exposure to 22    radiological materials or equipment, notice shall be given 23    to the employer within 90 days subsequent to the time that 24    the employee knows or suspects that he has received an 25    excessive dose of radiation.26    No defect or inaccuracy of such notice shall be a bar to   HB1285- 5 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1the maintenance of proceedings on arbitration or otherwise by 2the employee unless the employer proves that he is unduly 3prejudiced in such proceedings by such defect or inaccuracy.4    Notice of the accident shall give the approximate date and 5place of the accident, if known, and may be given orally or in 6writing.7    (d) Every employer shall notify each injured employee who 8has been granted compensation under the provisions of Section 98 of this Act of his rights to rehabilitation services and 10advise him of the locations of available public rehabilitation 11centers and any other such services of which the employer has 12knowledge.13    In any case, other than one where the injury was caused by 14exposure to radiological materials or equipment or asbestos 15unless the application for compensation is filed with the 16Commission within 3 years after the date of the accident, 17where no compensation has been paid, or within 2 years after 18the date of the last payment of compensation, where any has 19been paid, whichever shall be later, the right to file such 20application shall be barred.21    In any case of injury caused by exposure to radiological 22materials or equipment or asbestos, unless application for 23compensation is filed with the Commission within 25 years 24after the last day that the employee was employed in an 25environment of hazardous radiological activity or asbestos, 26the right to file such application shall be barred.  HB1285- 6 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1    If in any case except one where the injury was caused by 2exposure to radiological materials or equipment or asbestos, 3the accidental injury results in death application for 4compensation for death may be filed with the Commission within 53 years after the date of death where no compensation has been 6paid or within 2 years after the date of the last payment of 7compensation where any has been paid, whichever shall be 8later, but not thereafter.9    If an accidental injury caused by exposure to radiological 10material or equipment or asbestos results in death within 25 11years after the last day that the employee was so exposed 12application for compensation for death may be filed with the 13Commission within 3 years after the date of death, where no 14compensation has been paid, or within 2 years after the date of 15the last payment of compensation where any has been paid, 16whichever shall be later, but not thereafter.17    (e) Any contract or agreement made by any employer or his 18agent or attorney with any employee or any other beneficiary 19of any claim under the provisions of this Act within 7 days 20after the injury shall be presumed to be fraudulent.21    (f) Any condition or impairment of health of an employee 22employed as a firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), 23emergency medical technician-intermediate (EMT-I), advanced 24emergency medical technician (A-EMT), or paramedic which 25results directly or indirectly from any bloodborne pathogen, 26contagious staph infection, including Methicillin-resistant   HB1285- 7 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), lung or respiratory disease or 2condition, heart or vascular disease or condition, 3hypertension, tuberculosis, or cancer resulting in any 4disability (temporary, permanent, total, or partial) to the 5employee shall be rebuttably presumed to arise out of and in 6the course of the employee's firefighting, EMT, or paramedic 7employment and, further, shall be rebuttably presumed to be 8causally connected to the hazards or exposures of the 9employment. This presumption shall also apply to any hernia or 10hearing loss suffered by an employee employed as a 11firefighter, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or paramedic. However, this 12presumption shall not apply to any employee who has been 13employed as a firefighter, EMT, or paramedic for less than 5 14years at the time he or she files an Application for Adjustment 15of Claim concerning this condition or impairment with the 16Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission. The rebuttable 17presumption established under this subsection, however, does 18not apply to an emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency 19medical technician-intermediate (EMT-I), advanced emergency 20medical technician (A-EMT), or paramedic employed by a private 21employer if the employee spends the preponderance of his or 22her work time for that employer engaged in medical transfers 23between medical care facilities or non-emergency medical 24transfers to or from medical care facilities. The changes made 25to this subsection by Public Act 98-291 shall be narrowly 26construed. The Finding and Decision of the Illinois Workers'   HB1285- 8 -LRB104 07419 SPS 17460 b1Compensation Commission under only the rebuttable presumption 2provision of this subsection shall not be admissible or be 3deemed res judicata in any disability claim under the Illinois 4Pension Code arising out of the same medical condition; 5however, this sentence makes no change to the law set forth in 6Krohe v. City of Bloomington, 204 Ill.2d 392. 7(Source: P.A. 102-493, eff. 8-20-21.)